Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2275.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6167YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2275 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 252C.9 Child support delinquent 1 payments ââ proof of source. 2 If an individual makes a payment of delinquent child 3 support which the individual has been court-ordered to pay, 4 the individual must provide paystubs, receipts, or other 5 documentation evidencing the source or sources of funds for the 6 delinquent child support payment. If no such documentation 7 exists, the individual making the payment shall provide a sworn 8 statement detailing the source or sources of funds for the 9 delinquent child support payment. 10